Utah statutes.
58-78-304.   Exemption from licensure.

In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the following may engage in the practice of vocational rehabilitation counseling subject to the stated circumstances and limitations, without being licensed under this chapter if they do not use the title of vocational rehabilitation counselor or are not directly represented or held out to the public to be legally qualified to engage in the practice of vocational rehabilitation counseling before the public in this state:

(1)  an individual employed or supervised by a licensed vocational rehabilitation counselor while carrying out specific tasks under the licensee's supervision; and

(2)  a priest, rabbi, or minister of the gospel of any religious denomination.

